Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.270

Petition for appointment of guardian for adult.

(1) A person interested in an adult's welfare, including the adult for whom the order is sought, may petition for appointment of a guardian for the adult.

(2) A person interested in the welfare of a minor who, within 45 days of the filing of the petition, will attain the age of majority, may petition for appointment of a guardian for the minor. The minor may petition on the minor's own behalf.

(3) A petition under subsection (1) or (2) of this section must state the petitioner's name, principal residence, current street address, if different, relationship to the respondent, interest in the appointment, the name and address of any attorney representing the petitioner, and, to the extent known, the following:

(a) The respondent's name, age, principal residence, current street address, if different, and, if different, address of the dwelling in which it is proposed the respondent will reside if the petition is granted;

(b) The name and address of the respondent's:

(i) Spouse or domestic partner or, if the respondent has none, an adult with whom the respondent has shared household responsibilities for more than six months in the 12-month period immediately before the filing of the petition;

(ii) Adult children or, if none, each parent and adult sibling of the respondent, or, if none, at least one adult nearest in kinship to the respondent who can be found with reasonable diligence;

(iii) Adult stepchildren whom the respondent actively parented during the stepchildren's minor years and with whom the respondent had an ongoing relationship in the two-year period immediately before the filing of the petition; and

(iv) Parents, if living and involved in the respondent's life;

(c) The name and current address of each of the following, if applicable:

(i) A person responsible for care of the respondent;

(ii) Any attorney currently representing the respondent;

(iii) Any representative payee appointed by the social security administration for the respondent;

(iv) A guardian or conservator acting for the respondent in this state or in another jurisdiction;

(v) A trustee or custodian of a trust or custodianship of which the respondent is a beneficiary;

(vi) Any fiduciary for the respondent appointed by the department of veterans affairs;

(vii) An agent designated under a power of attorney for health care in which the respondent is identified as the principal;

(viii) An agent designated under a power of attorney for finances in which the respondent is identified as the principal;

(ix) A person nominated as guardian by the respondent;

(x) A person nominated as guardian by the respondent's parent or spouse or domestic partner in a will or other signed record;

(xi) A proposed guardian and the reason the proposed guardian should be selected; and

(xii) A person known to have routinely assisted the respondent with decision making during the six months immediately before the filing of the petition;

(d) The reason a guardianship is necessary, including a brief description of:

(i) The nature and extent of the respondent's alleged need;

(ii) Any protective arrangement instead of guardianship or other less restrictive alternatives for meeting the respondent's alleged need which have been considered or implemented;

(iii) If no protective arrangement instead of guardianship or other less restrictive alternatives have been considered or implemented, the reason they have not been considered or implemented; and

(iv) The reason a protective arrangement instead of guardianship or other less restrictive alternative is insufficient to meet the respondent's alleged need;

(e) Whether the petitioner seeks a limited guardianship or full guardianship;

(f) If the petitioner seeks a full guardianship, the reason a limited guardianship or protective arrangement instead of guardianship is not appropriate;

(g) If a limited guardianship is requested, the powers to be granted to the guardian;

(h) The name and current address, if known, of any person with whom the petitioner seeks to limit the respondent's contact;

(i) If the respondent has property other than personal effects, a general statement of the respondent's property, with an estimate of its value, including any insurance or pension, and the source and amount of other anticipated income or receipts; and

(j) Whether the respondent needs an interpreter, translator, or other form of support to communicate effectively with the court or understand court proceedings.

[ 2024 c 267 s 3; 2019 c 437 s 302.]